Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5142.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [144.601] HOSPITAL CHARITY CARE PAYMENT PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Charity care adjustments" has the meaning given in Minnesota Rules, part 4650.0102, subpart 9. new text end new text begin (c) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of health. new text end new text begin (d) "Cost-to-charge ratio" means the following as reported to the commissioner under Minnesota Rules, chapter 4650: a hospital's total operating expenses, not including bad debt, divided by the sum of the hospital's total charges for patient care and the hospital's operating revenue. new text end new text begin (e) "Eligible hospital" means a hospital that: new text end new text begin (1) is licensed under sections 144.50 to 144.56; new text end new text begin (2) is located within the state; new text end new text begin (3) has filed a Medicare cost report with the Healthcare Cost Report Information System; new text end new text begin (4) is nonprofit; and new text end new text begin (5) is not excluded from eligibility under subdivision 4. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Charity care account created; appropriations. new text end new text begin A charity care account is created in the special revenue fund. Money in the account is appropriated to the commissioner of health each fiscal year: new text end new text begin (1) to make payments to eligible hospitals under the hospital charity care payment program established in this section; and new text end new text begin (2) for program administration, in an amount up to $....... each fiscal year. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Hospital charity care payment program established. new text end new text begin The commissioner of health must establish and administer a hospital charity care payment program, in which the commissioner makes payments to each eligible hospital that applies for a payment, for the charity care adjustments provided by the eligible hospital. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Hospitals excluded from eligibility. new text end new text begin The following hospitals are not eligible for payments under this section: new text end new text begin (1) state-owned or state-operated regional treatment centers and all state-operated services; new text end new text begin (2) federal Veterans Administration Medical Centers; and new text end new text begin (3) long-term acute care hospitals. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Application. new text end new text begin Each eligible hospital seeking a payment or payments under this section in a fiscal year must apply to the commissioner in a form and manner specified by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Calculations. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must calculate each eligible hospital's payment amount according to paragraph (b) or (c). In calculating payments under this subdivision, each eligible hospital's charity care adjustments must be adjusted to cost basis by multiplying the eligible hospital's charity care adjustments by the eligible hospital's cost-to-charge ratio. new text end new text begin (b) If the amount in the charity care account available to make payments to eligible hospitals in a fiscal year is equal to or greater than the total amount of charity care adjustments provided by all eligible hospitals for the most recent year for which data is available, the payment amount for each eligible hospital is equal to the amount of charity care adjustments provided by the eligible hospital for the most recent year for which data is available. new text end new text begin (c) If the amount in the charity care account available to make payments to eligible hospitals in a fiscal year is less than the total amount of charity care adjustments provided by all eligible hospitals for the most recent year for which data is available, the commissioner must determine, for the most recent year for which data is available, the percentage of charity care adjustments provided by each eligible hospital out of the total amount of charity care adjustments provided by all eligible hospitals. The payment amount for each eligible hospital is equal to the percentage of charity care adjustments provided by the eligible hospital multiplied by the amount in the charity care account available for payments to eligible hospitals in that fiscal year. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Payments. new text end new text begin The commissioner must make payments to eligible hospitals at least once per fiscal year and may make payments more frequently on a schedule determined by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Reporting requirements. new text end new text begin An eligible hospital receiving one or more payments under this section must report to the commissioner, in a form and manner specified by the commissioner, information needed for the commissioner to evaluate the program. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256.9656, is amended to read: 256.9656 DEPOSITS INTO THE GENERAL FUND. All money collected under section 256.9657new text begin , subdivisions 1, 2a to 3a, and 7,new text end shall be deposited in the general fund. Deposits do not cancel and are available until expended. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026, and applies to surcharges and civil penalties collected on or after that date. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256.9657, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Hospital surcharge. (a) deleted text begin Effective October 1, 1992,deleted text end Each Minnesota hospital except facilities of the federal Indian Health Service and regional treatment centers shall pay to the deleted text begin medical assistancedeleted text end new text begin charity carenew text end account new text begin in the special revenue fund new text end a surcharge equal to 1.4 percent of net patient revenues excluding net Medicare revenues reported by that provider to the health care cost information system according to the schedule in subdivision 4. (b) Effective July 1, 1994, the surcharge under paragraph (a) is increased to 1.56 percent. (c) Notwithstanding the Medicare cost finding and allowable cost principles, the hospital surcharge is not an allowable cost for purposes of rate setting under sections 256.9685 to 256.9695. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026, and applies to surcharges collected on or after that date. new text end